Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FISHING IN THE NEIGHBORHOOD PROGRAM; APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the game and fish fund to the commissioner of natural resources to expand the fishing in the neighborhood program to counties and cities throughout the state of Minnesota to increase angling opportunities for children, public awareness, and environmental stewardship. new text end